Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 20. Parent and Child.

Collateral references. —

Child Custody and Visitation Law and Practice (Matthew Bender).

Nina M. Vitek, Disputed Paternity Proceedings (Matthew Bender).

Family Law Litigation Guide with Forms: Discovery, Evidence, Trial Practice (Matthew Bender).

Soler, Bell, Jameson, Representing the Child Client (Matthew Bender).

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Illegitimate Children, § 1 et seq.

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Infants, §§ 1-11

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parent and Child, § 1 et seq.

43 C.J.S., Infants, § 1-22

67A C.J.S., Parent and Child, § 1 et seq.

Tort liability of public authority for failure to remove parentally abused or neglected children from parents’ custody, 60 ALR4th 942.

Sec. 25.20.010.
Age of majority.

A person is considered to have arrived at majority at the age of 18, and thereafter has control of the person’s own actions and business and has all the rights and is subject to all the liabilities of citizens of full age, except as otherwise provided by statute.

History.

(§ 20-1-1 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 1977)

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to petitions to remove the disabilities of minority, see AS

09.55.590

.

Sec. 25.20.020.
Arrival at majority upon marriage.

A person arrives at the age of majority upon being married according to law, unless the person is under the marriageable age of consent as defined in AS

25.05.171(a)

, in which case the person reaches majority upon reaching the marriageable age of consent.

History.

(§ 20-1-2 ACLA 1949; am § 100 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 25.20.025.
Examination and treatment of minors.

Except as prohibited under AS

18.16.010(a)(3)

,

a minor who is living apart from the minor’s parents or legal guardian and who is managing the minor’s own financial affairs, regardless of the source or extent of income, may give consent for medical and dental services for the minor;

a minor may give consent for medical and dental services if the parent or legal guardian of the minor cannot be contacted or, if contacted, is unwilling either to grant or withhold consent; however, where the parent or legal guardian cannot be contacted or, if contacted, is unwilling either to grant or to withhold consent, the provider of medical or dental services shall counsel the minor keeping in mind not only the valid interests of the minor but also the valid interests of the parent or guardian and the family unit as best the provider presumes them;

a minor who is the parent of a child may give consent to medical and dental services for the minor or the child;

a minor may give consent for diagnosis, prevention or treatment of pregnancy, and for diagnosis and treatment of venereal disease;

the parent or guardian of the minor is relieved of all financial obligation to the provider of the service under this section.

The consent of a minor who represents that the minor may give consent under this section is considered valid if the person rendering the medical or dental service relied in good faith upon the representations of the minor.

Nothing in this section may be construed to remove liability of the person performing the examination or treatment for failure to meet the standards of care common throughout the health professions in the state or for intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 204 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 73 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 208 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

09.65.100

. Renumbered in 1994.

Cross references. —

For age of majority, see AS

25.20.010

and

25.20.020

.

Sec. 25.20.030.
Duty of parent and child to maintain each other.

Each parent is bound to maintain the parent’s children when poor and unable to work to maintain themselves.
Each child is bound to maintain the child’s parents in like circumstances.

History.

(§ 21-3-1 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For persons liable for support and burial, see AS

47.25.230

.

Sec. 25.20.040.
Maintenance and education of minor out of income of the minor’s property.

If a minor who has a parent living has property from which income is sufficient for maintenance and education in a manner more expensive than the parent can reasonably afford, considering the situation of the parent’s family and all the circumstances of the case, the expenses of the minor’s maintenance and education may be defrayed out of the income of the property, in whole or in part, as judged reasonable by the court.
The expenses may be allowed accordingly in the settlement of the accounts of the minor’s guardian.

History.

(§ 21-3-2 ACLA 1949; am § 101 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 25.20.045.
Legitimacy of children conceived by artificial insemination.

A child, born to a married woman by means of artificial insemination performed by a licensed physician and consented to in writing by both spouses, is considered for all purposes the natural and legitimate child of both spouses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 20.20.010. Renumbered in 1982.

Collateral references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d, Illegitimate Children, §§ 1, 2

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parent and Child, §§ 5, 7.

2 C.J.S., Adoption of Persons, §§ 2, 16.

Rights and obligations resulting from human artificial insemination, 83 ALR4th 295.

Sec. 25.20.050.
Legitimation by subsequent marriage, acknowledgment in writing, or adjudication.

A child born out of wedlock is legitimated and considered the heir of the putative parent when (1) the putative parent subsequently marries the undisputed parent of the child; (2) for acknowledgments made before July 1, 1997, the putative parent acknowledges, in writing, being a parent of the child; (3) for acknowledgments made on or after July 1, 1997, the putative father and the mother both sign a form for acknowledging paternity under AS

18.50.165

; or (4) the putative parent is determined by a superior court without jury or by another tribunal, upon sufficient evidence, to be a parent of the child. Acceptable evidence includes evidence that the putative parent’s conduct and bearing toward the child, either by word or act, indicates that the child is the child of the putative parent. That conduct may be construed by the tribunal to constitute evidence of parentage. When indefinite, ambiguous, or uncertain terms are used, the tribunal may use extrinsic evidence to show the putative parent’s intent.

The Bureau of Vital Statistics, as custodian of the original certificates of birth of all persons born in the state, is designated as the depository for such acknowledgment and adjudication. The acknowledgment or adjudication shall be forwarded to the bureau in accordance with appropriate regulations of the bureau, and shall be noted on and filed with the corresponding original certificate of birth.

In case of the birth in this state of a child out of wedlock and the legitimation of the child in accordance with this section, at the written request of the parents, or either of them or of the legal guardian, or of the person when of legal age, the Bureau of Vital Statistics shall prepare and place on file a substitute birth certificate, in accordance with the laws and regulations of the bureau pertaining to new certificates of this type.

The results of a genetic test that is of a type generally acknowledged as reliable by an accreditation body designated by the Secretary of Health and Human Services and performed by a laboratory approved by such an accreditation body shall be admitted and weighed in conjunction with other evidence in determining the statistical probability that the putative parent is a legal parent of the child in question. However, a genetic test described in this subsection that establishes a probability of parentage at 95 percent or higher creates a presumption of parentage that may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence.

Except as provided in (i) of this section, in proceedings in which paternity is contested, the tribunal shall order the parties, including the child, to submit to testing as described in (d) of this section upon request of

the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or the child support enforcement agency of another state; or

a party, including a sworn statement

alleging the paternity of an individual and setting out facts that show a reasonable possibility that the mother and that individual had sexual contact that could have resulted in the conception of the child; or

denying the paternity of an individual and setting out facts that show a reasonable possibility that the mother and that individual did not have sexual contact that could have resulted in the conception of the child.

The child support enforcement agency or child support services agency, as appropriate, may recover the costs of testing ordered under (e) of this section from the alleged father unless the testing establishes that the individual is not the father, except that costs may not be recovered from a person who is a recipient of cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under AS 47.27 (Alaska temporary assistance program). For purposes of this subsection, a person who receives a diversion payment and self-sufficiency services under AS

47.27.026

is not considered to be a recipient of cash assistance or self-sufficiency services under AS 47.27.

A default judgment shall be entered against the defendant in an action where paternity is contested upon

a showing that process was served on the defendant as required under applicable state law and court rules;

a showing that the defendant has failed to appear at a hearing in the action or has failed to respond within a reasonable period of time as specified in court rules; and

any additional showing determined necessary by the court.

The tribunal in a paternity action shall give full faith and credit to a determination of paternity made by another state, whether established through voluntary acknowledgment or through administrative or judicial procedures.

If a tribunal finds that good cause exists not to order genetic testing after considering the best interests of the child, the tribunal may not order testing under (e) of this section.

Invoices, bills, or other standard documents showing charges for medical and related costs of pregnancy, childbirth, or genetic testing are admissible in an action to establish paternity without testimony or other evidence from the medical or other provider or third-party payor to provide the foundation for admissibility of the documents. The documents shall constitute prima facie evidence of the amounts incurred for such charges.

Upon the motion of the child support enforcement agency or child support services agency, as appropriate, or another party in the action to establish paternity, the tribunal shall issue a temporary order for support of the child whose paternity is being determined. The order may require periodic payments of support, health care coverage, or both. The order shall be effective until the tribunal issues a final order on paternity and a permanent order for support is issued or the tribunal dismisses the action. The temporary order may only be issued if the tribunal finds clear and convincing evidence of the paternity of the putative father on the basis of the results of the genetic tests and other evidence admitted in the proceeding.

The tribunal shall consider a completed and signed form for acknowledging paternity that meets the requirements of AS

18.50.165(a)

as a legal finding of paternity for a child born out of wedlock. For an acknowledgment signed on or after July 1, 1997, the acknowledgment may only be withdrawn by the earlier of the following dates: (1) 60 days after the date that the person signed it, or (2) the date on which judicial or administrative procedures are initiated to establish child support in the form of periodic payments or health care coverage for, or to determine paternity of, the child who is the subject of the acknowledgement. After this time period has passed, the acknowledgment may only be contested in superior court on the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake. The parent wishing to contest the acknowledgment carries the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence. Unless good cause is shown, the court may not stay child support or other legal responsibilities while the action to contest the acknowledgment is pending.

If a parent signs an acknowledgment of paternity under (a) of this section and does not successfully challenge the acknowledgment under (l) of this section, the child born out of wedlock is considered legitimated and the heir of the parent without further action of the tribunal to ratify the acknowledgment of paternity.

Each paternity order or acknowledgment made under this section must include in the records relating to the matter the social security numbers, if ascertainable, of the following persons:

the father;

the mother;

the child.

In this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized by state law to determine parentage.

History.

(§ 21-3-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1951; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1960; am §§ 3, 4 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1994; am § 11 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 36 — 41 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 12 ch 132 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (e)(1) of this section, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004. In 2004, in the first sentences of both subsection (f) and subsection (k), “or child support services agency, as appropriate,” was inserted to comply with the instruction in § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, that the name of the child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

was to be changed to the “child support services agency”.

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of (e) of this section on Rule 35, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 3, ch. 69, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for provisions relating to registration of birth of a child conceived or born out of wedlock, see AS

18.50.160(e)

and (f ); for child support services agency role in court actions to determine paternity, see AS

25.27.040

; for determination of parentage in certain interstate cases, see AS

25.25.701

and AS

25.27.022

; for administrative establishment and disestablishment of paternity, see AS

25.27.165

—

25.27.166

. For effect of the amendments to this section made by ch. 87, SLA 1997 on court rules, see §§ 149-151, and 154, ch. 87, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

For paternity, see 15 AAC 125, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section allows a substitute birth certificate when there is legitimization of the child by intermarriage (providing proof is offered that the marriage was between the parents of the child), as well as by court adjudication alone. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 29.

Only the third method of legitimation is specifically vested in the court. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

By implication, the Bureau of Vital Statistics has the power and duty to make its own determination of the fulfillment of the first two conditions of legitimation. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

Necessarily involved in legitimation is the administrative determination of illegitimacy at the time an original birth certificate is filed. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

For application of presumption of legitimacy to validity of original birth certificate, see 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

For right of child to legitimation procedures, see 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

An admission under oath or in writing of paternity in a foreign action could be recognized as satisfying the requirement of subdivision (a)(2) of this section that a father acknowledge his paternity of the child as a method of legitimation. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

The bureau should recognize foreign marriages as sufficient under subdivision (a)(1) of this section to establish a subsequent intermarriage as a basis for legitimation. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

For suggested standards of proof to establish that the man subsequently marrying a mother is the father of her child, for purposes of issuing a substitute birth certificate legitimating the child under subdivision (a)(1), see 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

For discussion of what constitutes a sufficient written acknowledgment of paternity under subdivision (a)(2), see 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

Erroneous entries in the original birth certificates of children born to unwed mothers naming the father are significant to show a mother’s acknowledgment of paternity corroborating the effect of subsequent intermarriage or written acknowledgment of paternity by the father, if it can be established that the entry was made by the mother or at her request, but such entries have no other evidentiary value. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

Legitimation may be effected by the bureau even though the acknowledged father is married to another woman, under the general policy of the statute. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 13.

Sec. 25.20.055.
Early acknowledgement of paternity program.

When a birth occurs to an unmarried woman in a hospital or en route to a hospital to which the woman is later admitted, the hospital shall ensure that a staff member

meets with the woman before release from the hospital;

attempts to meet with the father of the unmarried woman’s child, if possible;

presents to the mother and, if possible, the father, a pamphlet or statement regarding the rights and responsibilities of a natural parent; the Department of Health and Social Services shall prepare this pamphlet and distribute copies of it to each hospital in the state, to each physician in the state whose practice includes attendance at births, to each certified nurse midwife and certified direct-entry midwife in the state, and to other interested persons in the state who request copies;

provides to the mother and, if possible, the father, all forms, statements, or agreements necessary to voluntarily establish a parent and child relationship, including an acknowledgment of paternity form prepared under AS

18.50.165

;

on request of the mother and father, assists the father in completing specific forms, statements, or agreements necessary to establish a parent and child relationship between the father and the child; and

on request of the mother and father, mails a completed voluntary acknowledgment of paternity form to the state registrar for filing under AS

18.50.165

.

When a birth occurs to an unmarried woman who is not in a hospital for the birth nor admitted to a hospital immediately after the birth, and the birth is attended by a physician, certified nurse midwife, or certified direct-entry midwife, the physician, certified nurse midwife, or certified direct-entry midwife shall perform the duties described in (a)(2) - (6) of this section or ensure that an agent performs those duties.

When a birth occurs in a situation that is not covered by either (a) or (b) of this section, any adult may, upon request of the father and mother, assist them in filing a voluntary acknowledgement of paternity form with the state registrar under AS

18.50.165

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the Department of Health and Social Services may adopt regulations to establish exceptions for good cause that identify circumstances under which a hospital is not required to comply with (a) of this section. A hospital may be excused from complying with (a) of this section if the hospital meets those regulatory requirements.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1994; am § 42 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§
42, 43 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a)(3), substituted “certified nurse midwife” for “nurse-midwife”; inserted “certified” preceding “direct-entry”, and made stylistic changes; in (b), substituted “certified nurse midwife” for “nurse-midwife” twice, inserted “certified” preceding “direct-entry” twice.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of (d) of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Sec. 25.20.060.
Petition for award of child custody.

If there is a dispute over child custody, either parent may petition the superior court for resolution of the matter under AS

25.20.060

—

25.20.130

. The court shall award custody on the basis of the best interests of the child. In determining the best interests of the child, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including those factors enumerated in AS

25.24.150(c)

, and the presumption established in AS

25.24.150(g)

. In a custody determination under this section, the court shall provide for visitation by a grandparent or other person if that is in the best interests of the child.

Neither parent, regardless of the question of the child’s legitimacy, is entitled to preference in the awarding of custody.

The court may award shared custody to both parents if shared custody is determined by the court to be in the best interests of the child. An award of shared custody shall assure that the child has frequent and continuing contact with each parent to the maximum extent possible.

If the court finds that a parent or child is a victim of domestic violence, the court may order that the address and telephone number of the parent or child be kept confidential in the proceedings.

History.

(§ 6 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1995; am § 38 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 2004)

Sec. 25.20.061.
Visitation in proceedings involving domestic violence.

If visitation is awarded to a parent who has committed a crime involving domestic violence, against the other parent or a child of the two parents, within the five years preceding the award of visitation, the court may set conditions for the visitation, including

the transfer of the child for visitation must occur in a protected setting;

visitation shall be supervised by another person or agency and under specified conditions as ordered by the court;

the perpetrator shall attend and complete, to the satisfaction of the court, a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence that meets the standards set by the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

, or other counseling; the perpetrator shall be required to pay the costs of the program or other counseling;

the perpetrator shall abstain from possession or consumption of alcohol or controlled substances during the visitation and for 24 hours before visitation;

the perpetrator shall pay costs of supervised visitation as set by the court;

the prohibition of overnight visitation;

the perpetrator shall post a bond to the court for the return and safety of the child; and

any other condition necessary for the safety of the child, the other parent, or other household member.

History.

(§ 39 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Sec. 25.20.065.
Visitation rights of grandparent.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a child’s grandparent may petition the superior court for an order establishing reasonable rights of visitation between the grandparent and child if

the grandparent has established or attempted to establish ongoing personal contact with the child; and

visitation by the grandparent is in the child’s best interest.

After a decree or final order relating to child custody is entered under AS

25.20.060

or AS

25.24.150

or relating to an adoption under AS 25.23, a grandparent may petition under this section only if

the grandparent did not request the court to grant visitation rights during the pendency of proceedings under AS

25.20.060

, AS 25.23, or AS 25.24; or

there has been a change in circumstances relating to the custodial parent or the minor child that justifies reconsideration of the grandparent’s visitation rights.

When determining whether to grant rights of visitation between a grandparent and grandchild under this section, AS

25.20.060

, or AS 25.24, and when determining the terms and conditions to be attached to a right of grandparent visitation, the court shall consider whether there is a history of child abuse or domestic violence attributable to the grandparent’s son or daughter who is a parent of the grandchild.

History.

(§ 2 ch 30 SLA 1995)

Sec. 25.20.070.
Temporary custody of the child.

Unless it is shown to be detrimental to the welfare of the child considering the factors under AS

25.24.150(c)

, or unless the presumption under AS

25.24.150(g)

is present, the child shall have, to the greatest degree practical, equal access to both parents during the time that the court considers an award of custody under AS

25.20.060

—

25.20.130

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 2004)

Sec. 25.20.080.
Mediation of child custody matter.

Except as provided in (f) and (g) of this section, at any time within 30 days after a petition for child custody is filed under AS

25.20.060

the court may order the parties to submit to mediation. Each party has the right to challenge peremptorily one mediator appointed.

Mediation shall be conducted informally as a conference, or by telephone, or series of conferences, as determined by the mediator. The parties to the action and a court-appointed representative of the minor children shall attend.

If the mediator determines that mediation efforts are unsuccessful, the mediator shall terminate mediation and notify the court that mediation efforts have failed. The custody proceeding shall proceed in the usual manner.

Upon submission of the parties to mediation under this section, a pending child custody proceeding shall be stayed for a period of 30 days or until the court is notified that mediation efforts have failed. All court orders made during the pending custody proceeding remain in effect during the period of mediation.

Costs of mediation shall be paid as ordered by the court by one party, by both parties, or by the state if both parties are indigent.

The court may not order or refer parties to mediation in a proceeding concerning custody or visitation of a child if a protective order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

is in effect. The court may not order or refer parties to mediation if a party objects on the grounds that domestic violence has occurred between the parties unless the court finds that the conditions of (g)(1) — (3) of this section are met. If the court proposes or suggests mediation under this subsection,

mediation may not occur unless the victim of the alleged domestic violence agrees to the mediation; and

the court shall advise the parties that each party has the right to not agree to mediation and that the decision of each party will not bias other decisions of the court.

A mediator who receives a referral or order from a court to conduct mediation under (a) of this section shall evaluate whether domestic violence has occurred between the parties. A mediator may not engage in mediation when either party has committed a crime involving domestic violence unless

mediation is requested by the victim of the alleged domestic violence, or proposed by the court and agreed to by the victim;

mediation is provided by a mediator who is trained in domestic violence in a manner that protects the safety of the victim and any household member, taking into account the results of an assessment of the potential danger posed by the perpetrator and the risk of harm to the victim; and

the victim is permitted to have in attendance a person of the victim’s choice, including an attorney.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982; am §§ 40, 41 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For court rule relating to mediation, see Rule 100, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

Sec. 25.20.090.
Factors for consideration in awarding shared child custody.

In determining whether to award shared custody of a child the court shall consider

the child’s preference if the child is of sufficient age and capacity to form a preference;

the needs of the child;

the stability of the home environment likely to be offered by each parent;

the education of the child;

the advantages of keeping the child in the community where the child presently resides;

the optimal time for the child to spend with each parent considering

the actual time spent with each parent;

the proximity of each parent to the other and to the school in which the child is enrolled;

the feasibility of travel between the parents;

special needs unique to the child that may be better met by one parent than the other;

the willingness and ability of each parent to facilitate and encourage a close and continuing relationship between the other parent and the child, except that the court may not consider this willingness and ability if one parent shows that the other parent has sexually assaulted or engaged in domestic violence against the parent or a child, and that a continuing relationship with the other parent will endanger the health or safety of either the parent or the child;

any findings and recommendations of a neutral mediator;

any evidence of domestic violence, child abuse, or child neglect in the proposed custodial household or a history of violence between the parents;

evidence that substance abuse by either parent or other members of the household directly affects the emotional or physical well-being of the child;

other factors the court considers pertinent.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 111 SLA 2004)

Sec. 25.20.095.
Custody and visitation proceedings involving a military parent; delegation of visitation.

In determining the availability of a parent for custody or visitation, if a parent is deployed or in a position where the parent may be deployed, the court shall take particular care to ensure that the child has the maximum opportunity, consistent with the best interests of the child, to have contact with the parent. Except as provided in this section, a parent’s temporary duty, mobilization, or deployment to military service and the resultant temporary disruption to the child of the parent may not be a factor in a court’s decision to grant or deny a petition for custody or visitation.

A parent who is deployed may petition a court of competent jurisdiction for custody or visitation. The petition shall be construed to be an application for affirmative relief, consistent with the protections afforded under 50 U.S.C. App. 501 — 596 (Servicemembers Civil Relief Act) and may include a request to delegate the deployed parent’s visitation rights to a family member.

A court shall order a delegation of visitation rights based on a petition filed under (b) of this section if the court finds that

the family member receiving the delegation has an existing close relationship to the child; and

the delegation is in the child’s best interest.

A hearing on a petition filed under this section shall be expedited by the court on a motion filed by the deployed parent.

A parent who is deployed may not be found to have waived any rights or protections with regard to custody or visitation of the deployed parent’s child unless the deployed parent expressly waives the right or protection in writing or on the record.

A court order entered under this section must require that

the nondeployed parent make the child reasonably available for visitation to the deployed parent when the deployed parent is on leave if the visits are in the child’s best interest;

each parent facilitate contact, including telephonic and electronic contact, between the other parent and the child if the contact is in the child’s best interest; electronic contact with a video image must be facilitated whenever feasible;

the deployed parent provide timely information to the nondeployed parent regarding the deployed parent’s leave schedule; and

each parent provide immediate notification of a change of address or contact information as provided under AS

25.20.110(e)(5)

.

In making a determination of the best interests of the child, the court shall consider the factors under AS

25.24.150(c)

and apply the rebuttable presumption under AS

25.24.150(g)

to visitation, delegation, and custody orders issued under this section. In addition, there is a rebuttable presumption that a deployed parent’s visitation rights may not be delegated to a family member who has a history of perpetrating domestic violence against a spouse, a child, or a domestic living partner, or to a family member with an individual in the family member’s household who has a history of perpetrating domestic violence against a spouse, a child, or a domestic living partner.

In this section,

“deployment” or “deployed” means military services performed in compliance with a valid order received by an active duty or reserve member of the armed services of the United States, National Guard, or United States Coast Guard to report for combat operations, contingency operations, peacekeeping operations, temporary duty, a remote tour of duty, or other active service for which the deploying parent reports unaccompanied by any family member;

“family member” means a person who is an adult sibling, aunt, uncle, first cousin, or grandparent related by blood, adoption, or marriage or a stepparent to the child who is the subject of a custody order issued under this section;

“military service” includes the period from which the deployed parent receives and is subject to deployment orders and the period in which the parent is awaiting travel or remains deployed because of sickness, wounds, leave, or other lawful cause;

“parent” includes a legal guardian of the child.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For effect of (d) of this section on Rule 77(g), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 5, ch. 44, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

For effect of this section on Rule 99(a), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 4, ch. 44, SLA 2010, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 44, SLA 2010 makes this section effective June 5, 2010, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 25.20.100.
Reasons for denial to be set out.

If a parent or the guardian ad litem requests shared custody of a child and the court denies the request, the reasons for the denial shall be stated on the record.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982)

Sec. 25.20.110.
Modification of child custody or visitation.

An award of custody of a child or visitation with the child may be modified if the court determines that a change in circumstances requires the modification of the award and the modification is in the best interests of the child. If a parent opposes the modification of the award of custody or visitation with the child and the modification is granted, the court shall enter on the record its reason for the modification.

When making a determination relating to child custody under (a) of this section, the court shall consider the past history of the parents with respect to their compliance with the child support payment provisions of temporary or permanent support orders or agreements relating to the child or to other children. Under this subsection, the court may consider a parent’s failure to pay child support only if the parent had actual knowledge of the amount of the child support obligation and had funds available for payment of support or could have obtained those funds through reasonable efforts, as determined by the court.

In a proceeding involving the modification of an award for custody of a child or visitation with a child, a finding that a crime involving domestic violence has occurred since the last custody or visitation determination is a finding of change of circumstances under (a) of this section.

Except as provided in (e) — (h) of this section, a parent’s temporary duty, mobilization, or deployment to military service and the resultant temporary disruption to the schedule of a child of the parent may not be a factor in finding a change of circumstances on a motion to modify child custody or visitation.

A court may provide for a temporary modification of a custody or visitation order during the period of a parent’s deployment to military service to make reasonable accommodation for the deployment. The temporary order must specify that deployment is the basis of the order and include provisions for

custody or reasonable visitation during a period of leave granted to the deployed parent if the custody or visitation is in the child’s best interest;

termination of the temporary order and resumption of the permanent order within 10 days after notification of the deployed parent’s ability to resume custody or visitation unless the court finds that resumption of the custody or visitation order in effect before deployment is no longer in the child’s best interest; the nondeployed parent shall bear the burden of proving that resumption of the order is no longer in the child’s best interest;

a hearing if a child of a deployed parent has been moved out of state and the nondeployed parent has filed a motion that alleges that resumption of the permanent custody order will result in immediate danger of irreparable harm to the child or that the presumption under AS

25.24.150(g)

exists;

delegation, on request of the deployed parent, of the deployed parent’s visitation rights under an existing order, if any, to another family member who has an existing close relationship to the child if the delegation is in the child’s best interest; and

immediate notification by each parent of a change of address or contact information to the other parent and to the court; if a valid court order issued under AS

12.61.120

or AS

25.20.060

or an equivalent provision in another jurisdiction is in effect that requires that the address or contact information of the parent be kept confidential, the notification shall be made to the court only, and a copy of the order shall be included in the notification.

A court shall expedite a hearing to modify custody or visitation on a motion made by a parent who is subject to deployment.

In making a determination of the best interests of the child, the court shall consider the factors under AS

25.24.150(c)

and apply the rebuttable presumption under AS

25.24.150(g)

to visitation, delegation, and custody orders issued under this section. In addition, there is a rebuttable presumption that a deployed parent’s visitation rights may not be delegated to a family member who has a history of perpetrating domestic violence against a spouse, a child, or a domestic living partner, or to a family member with an individual in the family member’s household who has a history of perpetrating domestic violence against a spouse, a child, or a domestic living partner.

In this section, “deployment,” “deployed,” “family member,” “military service,” and “parent” have the meanings given in AS

25.20.095

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 88 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1990; am § 42 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For effect of (f) of this section on Rule 77(g), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 5, ch. 44, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 5, 2010, added subsections (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h).